apertium-mal.mal.lexc
LEXICON NP-TOP-BRAZIL

%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ല്‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ലിനെ CLIT-N-ACC ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ലിന്റെ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ലിന് CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ലിനാല്‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ലില്‍  CLIT-N-LOC ; !""
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<soc%>:ലിനോട് CLIT-N-NOM ; !""

LEXICON PRON-PERS-NNAAN 

ഞാന്‍%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ഞാന്‍ CLIT-N-NOM ;
ഞാന്‍%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:എന്നെ CLIT-N-ACC ;
ഞാന്‍%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:എന്റെ CLIT-N-GEN ; 
ഞാന്‍%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:എനിക്ക് CLIT-N ;
ഞാന്‍%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:എന്നുടെ CLIT-N ; 
ഞാന്‍%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:എന്നാല്‍ CLIT-N ; 
ഞാന്‍%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:എന്നില്‍ CLIT-N-LOC ;
ഞാന്‍%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<soc%>:എന്നോട് CLIT-N ; 


LEXICON PRON-PERS-NII

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ീ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "i"
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ിന്നെ CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "inne"
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ിന്റെ CLIT-N-GEN ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ിനക്ക് CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ിന്നുടെ CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ിന്നില്‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ിന്നാല്‍ CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<soc%>:ിന്നോട് CLIT-N ; ! ""

LEXICON PRON-PERS-AVAN

!%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ന്‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; 
!%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ന്റെ CLIT-N-GEN ; 
!%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:നെ CLIT-N-ACC ; 

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:്‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:െ CLIT-N-ACC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:്റെ CLIT-N-GEN ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ുടെ CLIT-N-GEN ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:് CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ില്‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ാല്‍ CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<soc%>:ോട് CLIT-N ; ! ""

LEXICON PRON-PERS-AVAL

!%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ള്‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; 
!%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>ള്‍ക് CLIT-N ; ! "k"
!%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>ളുടെ CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "k"

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:്‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:െ CLIT-N-ACC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ുടെ CLIT-N-GEN ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:്‍ക് CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ില്‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ാല്‍ CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<soc%>:ോട് CLIT-N ; ! ""

LEXICON PRON-PERS-NNANNAL

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1x%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:്‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1x%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:െ CLIT-N-ACC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1x%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ുടെ CLIT-N-GEN ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1x%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:്‍ക് CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1x%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ില്‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1x%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ാല്‍ CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1x%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<soc%>:ോട് CLIT-N ; ! ""

LEXICON PRON-PERS-NAAM

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1i%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ാം CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1i%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:മ്മള്‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1i%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:മ്മെ CLIT-N-ACC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1i%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:മ്മുടെ CLIT-N-GEN ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1i%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:മുക്ക് CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1i%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:മ്മില്‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1i%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ാമാല്‍ CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1i%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<soc%>:മ്മോട് CLIT-N ; ! ""

LEXICON PRON-PERS-NINNAL

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:്‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:െ CLIT-N-ACC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ുടെ CLIT-N-GEN ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:്‍ക് CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ില്‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ാല്‍ CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<soc%>:ോട് CLIT-N ; ! ""

LEXICON PRON-PERS-AVAR

!%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ര്‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; 
!%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:രുടെ CLIT-N-GEN ; 
!%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ര്‍ക്ക് CLIT-N ; 

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:്‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:െ CLIT-N-ACC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ുടെ CLIT-N-GEN ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:്‍ക്ക്  CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ില്‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ാല്‍ CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<soc%>:ോട് CLIT-N ; ! ""

LEXICON PRON-PERS-ADDEHA

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ം CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ത്തെ CLIT-N-ACC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ത്തിന്റെ CLIT-N-GEN ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ത്തിന് CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ത്തില്‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ത്താല്‍ CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<soc%>:ത്തോട് CLIT-N ; ! ""

LEXICON PRON-REF-THAN

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ാന്‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ന്നെ CLIT-N-ACC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ന്റെ CLIT-N-GEN ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:നിക്ക് CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ന്നില്‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ന്നാല്‍ CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<soc%>:ന്നോട് CLIT-N ; ! ""

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ങ്ങള്‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ങ്ങളെ CLIT-N-ACC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ങ്ങളുടെ CLIT-N-GEN ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ങ്ങള്‍ക്ക് CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ങ്ങളില്‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ങ്ങളാല്‍ CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<soc%>:ങ്ങളോട് CLIT-N ; ! ""

!%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ാങ്കള്‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
!%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ാങ്കളെ CLIT-N-ACC ; ! ""
!%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ാങ്കളുടെ CLIT-N-GEN ; ! ""
!%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ാങ്കള്‍ക് CLIT-N ; ! ""
!%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ാങ്കളില്‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! ""
!%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ാങ്കളാല്‍ CLIT-N ; ! ""
!%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<soc%>:ാങ്കളോട് CLIT-N ; ! ""

LEXICON PRON-DEM-AT

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ത് CLIT-N-NOM ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:തു CLIT-N-NOM ; ! debug
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:തിനെ CLIT-N-ACC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:തിന്റെ CLIT-N-GEN ;  
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:തിന് CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:തിനു CLIT-N ; ! "" ! "debug"
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:തില്‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:തിനാല്‍ CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<soc%>:തിനോട് CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<soc%>:തിനോടു CLIT-N ; ! "" ! 

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:വ CLIT-N-NOM ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:വയെ CLIT-N-ACC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:വയുടെ CLIT-N-GEN ;  
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:വയ്ക്ക് CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:വയില്‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:വയാല്‍ CLIT-N ; ! ""
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<soc%>:വയോട് CLIT-N ; ! ""


LEXICON PRON-DEM-IT 

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-N-NOM ; 

LEXICON PRON-ITG-ENT

%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:് CLIT-N-NOM ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ു് CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "debug"
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ു CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "debug"
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ിന് CLIT-N-NOM ; 

LEXICON PRON-IND
%<prn%>%<ind%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-N-NOM ;

LEXICON ProperNouns 
ബ്രസീല്‍:ബ്രസീ NP-TOP-BRAZIL; ! "brasīl‍" ! "Brazil"
ഇസ്രയേല്‍:ഇസ്രയേ NP-TOP-BRAZIL; ! "israyēl‍" ! "Israel"
പോര്‍ച്ചുഗല്‍:പോര്‍ച്ചുഗ NP-TOP-BRAZIL; ! "pēār‍ccugal‍" ! "Portugal"
സെനെഗല്‍:സെനെഗ NP-TOP-BRAZIL; ! "senegal‍" ! "Senegal"
